Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1109
Officers; alternate; appointment to only one office.

No person shall accept appointment as alternate to more than one office. No person who has accepted appointment as a standby legislator shall, without first resigning therefrom, accept appointment as an alternate officer, nor shall any person who has accepted an appointment as an alternate officer, without first resigning therefrom, accept appointment as a standby legislator. No person, while regularly serving as judge of a court of record, shall accept appointment as an alternate to another office.

Laws 1959, c. 457, § 9, p. 1519.